Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.575

Electric vehicle service providers operating one or more publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment or direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment.

(1) This section applies to all electric vehicle service providers operating one or more publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment or direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment installed in Washington. If an electric vehicle service provider also operates electric vehicle supply equipment that is not available to the public, the requirements of this section apply only to that electric vehicle service provider's publicly available level 2 electric vehicle supply equipment or direct current fast charger electric vehicle supply equipment installed in Washington.

(2) By January 1, 2023, electric vehicle service providers must report inventory and payment method information to the national renewable energy laboratory, alternative fuels data center. The information must be reported, at a minimum, annually and must include, but is not limited to:

(a) Electric vehicle service provider information;

(b) Electric vehicle supply equipment inventory for both active and retired, decommissioned, or removed electric vehicle supply equipment in Washington;

(c) Electric vehicle supply equipment payment method information.

(3) The department may adopt additional reporting requirements to support compliance with chapter 238, Laws of 2021.

[ 2021 c 238 s 7.]